Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 60 OIL AND GAS CONSERVATION
34-60-113. Trial to be advanced.

An action, appellate review as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules, or other proceeding involving a test of the validity of any provision of this article or of a rule, regulation, or order shall be advanced for trial and be determined as expeditiously as feasible, and no postponement or continuance thereof shall be granted unless deemed imperative by the court.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 659, § 10(c).

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(10)(c).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-13.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1689, § 2, effective May 21.

34-60-114. Action for damages.

Nothing in this article, and no suit by or against the commission, and no violation charged or asserted against any person under any provisions of this article, or any rule, regulation, or order issued under this article, shall impair, abridge, or delay any cause of action for damages which any person may have or assert against any person violating any provision of this article, or any rule, regulation, or order issued under this article. Any person so damaged by the violation may sue for and recover such damages as he otherwise may be entitled to receive. In the event the commission fails to bring suit to enjoin any actual or threatened violation of this article, or of any rule, regulation, or order made under this article, then any person or party in interest adversely affected and who has notified the commission in writing of such violation or threat thereof and has requested the commission to sue, may, to prevent any or further violation, bring suit for that purpose in the district court of any county in which the commission could have brought suit. If, in such suit, the court holds that injunctive relief should be granted, then the commission shall be made a party and shall be substituted for the person who brought the suit, and the injunction shall be issued as if the commission had at all times been the complaining party.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 657, § 9(d).

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(9)(d).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-10.

34-60-115. Limitation on actions.

No action or other proceeding based upon a violation of this article or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall be commenced or maintained unless it has been commenced within one year from the date of the alleged violation.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 660, § 10(d).

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(10)(d).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-14.

34-60-116. Drilling units - pooling interests.

To prevent or to assist in preventing waste, to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, or to protect correlative rights, the commission, upon its own motion or on a proper application of an interested party, but after notice and hearing as provided in this section, may establish one or more drilling units of specified size and shape covering any pool or portion of a pool.

The application must include proof that either:

The applicant has filed an application with the local government having jurisdiction to approve the siting of the proposed oil and gas location and the local government's disposition of the application; or

The local government having jurisdiction does not regulate the siting of oil and gas locations.

In establishing a drilling unit, the acreage to be embraced within each unit and the shape thereof shall be determined by the commission from the evidence introduced at the hearing; except that, when found to be necessary for any of the purposes mentioned in subsection (1) of this section, the commission is authorized to divide any pool into zones and establish drilling units for each zone, which units may differ in size and shape from those established in any other zone, so that the pool as a whole will be efficiently and economically developed, but no drilling unit shall be smaller than the maximum area that can be efficiently and economically drained by one well. If the commission is unable to determine, based on the evidence introduced at the hearing, the existence of a pool and the appropriate acreage to be embraced within a drilling unit and the shape thereof, the commission is authorized to establish exploratory drilling units for the purpose of obtaining evidence as to the existence of a pool and the appropriate size and shape of the drilling unit to be applied thereto. In establishing the size and shape of the exploratory drilling unit, the commission may consider, but is not limited to, the size and shape of drilling units previously established by the commission for the same formation in other areas of the same geologic basin. Any spacing regulation made by the commission shall apply to each individual pool separately and not to all units on a statewide basis.

The order establishing a drilling unit:

Is subject to section 34-60-106 (2.5); and

May authorize one or more wells to be drilled and produced from the common source of supply on a drilling unit.

The commission, upon application, notice, and hearing, may decrease or increase the size of the drilling units or permit additional wells to be drilled within the established units in order to prevent or assist in preventing waste or to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, or to protect correlative rights, and the commission may enlarge the area covered by the order fixing drilling units, if the commission determines that the common source of supply underlies an area not covered by the order.

After an order fixing drilling units has been entered by the commission, the commencement of drilling of any well into any common source of supply for the purpose of producing oil or gas therefrom, at a location other than authorized by the order, is prohibited. The operation of any well drilled in violation of an order fixing drilling units is prohibited.

When two or more separately owned tracts are embraced within a drilling unit, or when there are separately owned interests in all or a part of the drilling unit, then persons owning the interests may pool their interests for the development and operation of the drilling unit.

In the absence of voluntary pooling, the commission, upon the application of a person who owns, or has secured the consent of the owners of, more than forty-five percent of the mineral interests to be pooled, may enter an order pooling all interests in the drilling unit for the development and operation of the drilling unit. Mineral interests that are owned by a person who cannot be located through reasonable diligence are excluded from the calculation.

The pooling order shall be made after notice and a hearing and must be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable and that afford to the owner of each tract or interest in the drilling unit the opportunity to recover or receive, without unnecessary expense, a just and equitable share.

Operations incident to the drilling of a well upon any portion of a unit covered by a pooling order shall be deemed for all purposes to be the conduct of operations upon each separately owned tract in the unit by the several owners of each separately owned tract. That portion of the production allocated or applicable to each tract included in a unit covered by a pooling order shall, when produced, be deemed for all purposes to have been produced from the tract by a well drilled on it.

Each pooling order must:

Make provision for the drilling of one or more wells on the drilling unit, if not already drilled, for the operation of the wells, and for the payment of the reasonable actual cost of the wells, including a reasonable charge for supervision and storage. Except as provided in subsection (7)(c) of this section, as to each nonconsenting owner who refuses to agree to bear a proportionate share of the costs and risks of drilling and operating the wells, the order must provide for reimbursement to the consenting owners who pay the costs of the nonconsenting owner's proportionate share of the costs and risks out of, and only out of, production from the unit representing the owner's interest, excluding royalty or other interest not obligated to pay any part of the cost thereof, if and to the extent that the royalty is consistent with the lease terms prevailing in the area and is not designed to avoid the recovery of costs provided for in subsection (7)(b) of this section. In the event of any dispute as to the costs, the commission shall determine the proper costs as specified in subsection (7)(b) of this section.

Determine the interest of each owner in the unit and provide that each consenting owner is entitled to receive, subject to royalty or similar obligations, the share of the production from the wells applicable to the owner's interest in the wells and, unless the owner has agreed otherwise, a proportionate part of the nonconsenting owner's share of the production until costs are recovered and that each nonconsenting owner is entitled to own and to receive the share of the production applicable to the owner's interest in the unit after the consenting owners have recovered the nonconsenting owner's share of the costs out of production;

Specify that a nonconsenting owner is immune from liability for costs arising from spills, releases, damage, or injury resulting from oil and gas operations on the drilling unit; and

Prohibit the operator from using the surface owned by a nonconsenting owner without permission from the nonconsenting owner.

Upon the determination of the commission, proper costs recovered by the consenting owners of a drilling unit from the nonconsenting owner's share of production from such a unit shall be as follows:

One hundred percent of the nonconsenting owner's share of the cost of surface equipment beyond the wellhead connections, including stock tanks, separators, treaters, pumping equipment, and piping, plus one hundred percent of the nonconsenting owner's share of the cost of operation of the well or wells commencing with first production and continuing until the consenting owners have recovered such costs. It is the intent that the nonconsenting owner's share of these costs of equipment and operation will be that interest that would have been chargeable to the nonconsenting owner had the owner initially agreed to pay the owner's share of the costs of the well or wells from the beginning of the operation.

Two hundred percent of that portion of the costs and expenses of staking, well site preparation, obtaining rights-of-way, rigging up, drilling, reworking, deepening or plugging back, testing, and completing the well, after deducting any cash contributions received by the consenting owners, and two hundred percent of that portion of the cost of equipment in the well, including the wellhead connections.

A nonconsenting owner of a tract in a drilling unit that is not subject to any lease or other contract for oil and gas development shall be deemed to have a landowner's proportionate royalty of:

For a gas well, thirteen percent until the consenting owners recover, only out of the nonconsenting owner's proportionate eighty-seven-percent share of production, the costs specified in subsection (7)(b) of this section; or

For an oil well, sixteen percent until the consenting owners recover, only out of the nonconsenting owner's proportionate eighty-four-percent share of production, the costs specified in subsection (7)(b) of this section.

After recovery of the costs, the nonconsenting owner then owns his or her full proportionate share of the wells, surface facilities, and production and then is liable for further costs as if the nonconsenting owner had originally agreed to drilling of the wells.

The commission shall not enter an order pooling an unleased nonconsenting mineral owner under subsection (6) of this section over protest of the owner unless the commission has received evidence that the unleased mineral owner has been tendered, no less than sixty days before the hearing, a reasonable offer, made in good faith, to lease upon terms no less favorable than those currently prevailing in the area at the time application for the order is made and that the unleased mineral owner has been furnished in writing the owner's share of the estimated drilling and completion cost of the wells, the location and objective depth of the wells, and the estimated spud date for the wells or range of time within which spudding is to occur. The offer must include a copy of or link to a brochure supplied by the commission that clearly and concisely describes the pooling procedures specified in this section and the mineral owner's options pursuant to those procedures.

During the period of cost recovery provided in this subsection (7), the commission retains jurisdiction to determine the reasonableness of costs of operation of the wells attributable to the interest of the nonconsenting owner.

The operator of wells under a pooling order in which there is a nonconsenting owner shall furnish the nonconsenting owner with a monthly statement of all costs incurred, together with the quantity of oil or gas produced, and the amount of proceeds realized from the sale of production during the preceding month. If the consenting owners recover the costs specified in subsection (7) of this section, the nonconsenting owner shall own the same interest in the wells and the production therefrom, and be liable for the further costs of the operation, as if the owner had participated in the initial drilling operations.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 653, § 6.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(6).

L. 52:

p. 130, §§ 2, 3.

L. 53:

p. 443, §§ 1, 2.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-4.

L. 55:

p. 651, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-4.

L. 77:

(7) and (8) amended, p. 1568, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 81:

(7)(c) R&RE, p. 1691, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(7)(d) added, p. 1216, § 1, effective April 4.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1414, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2018:

(1), (3), (7), and (8) amended, (SB 18-230), ch. 361, p. 2155, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1), (3), (6), (7)(a)(II), (7)(a)(III), (7)(c), and (7)(d)(I) amended and (7)(a)(IV) added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 517, § 14, effective April 16.

34-60-117. Prevention of waste - protection of correlative rights.

The commission has authority to prevent waste and protect correlative rights of all owners in every field or pool, and when necessary shall limit the production of oil and gas in any field or pool in the exercise of this authority.

If the commission limits the total amount of oil or gas which may be produced in any pool in this state to an amount less than that amount which the pool could produce if no restriction were imposed, the commission shall allocate or distribute the allowable production among the several wells or producing properties in the pool on a reasonable basis, preventing or minimizing reasonably avoidable drainage, so that each property will have the opportunity to produce or to receive its just and equitable share, subject to the reasonable necessities for the prevention of waste.

The commission shall give due regard to the fact that gas produced from oil pools is to be regulated and restricted in a manner as will protect the reasonable use of its energy for oil production.

Each person purchasing or taking for transportation oil or gas from any owner or producer shall purchase or take ratably, without discrimination in favor of any owner or producer over any other owner or producer in the same common source of supply offering to sell his oil or gas produced therefrom to such person. If two or more persons purchase or take for transportation oil or gas from any common source of supply in quantities such that any tract of land of separate ownership is not producing its just and equitable share from the pool, the person purchasing or taking from the tract producing more than its just and equitable share shall, upon the proper offer to sell being made, reduce the amount purchased or taken from such tract and purchase from each tract not producing its just and equitable share so that each tract of land may produce its just and equitable share of production from the pool. In the event that any such purchaser or person taking oil or gas for transportation is likewise a producer or owner, he is prohibited from discriminating in favor of his own production or storage, or production or storage in which he may be interested, and his own production and storage shall be treated as that of any other producer or owner; but no owner or producer, who is also a purchaser of oil and gas, or who has a market for his oil and gas or either thereof, has the right to invoke the benefits of this section.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 655, § 7.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(7).

L. 52:

p. 131, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-6.

L. 55:

p. 650, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-6.

34-60-118. Agreements for development and unit operations.

An agreement for repressuring or pressure maintenance operations, cycling or recycling operations, including the extraction and separation of liquid hydrocarbons from natural gas in connection therewith, or for carrying on any other methods of unit or cooperative development or operation of a field or pool or a part of either, is authorized and may be performed, and shall not be held or construed to violate any statutes relating to trusts, monopolies, or contracts and combinations in restraint of trade, if the agreement is approved by the commission as being in the public interest for conservation or is reasonably necessary to increase ultimate recovery or to prevent waste of oil or gas. Any such agreement entered into prior to July 1, 1951, for any such purpose is approved.

The commission upon the application of any interested person shall hold a hearing to consider the need for the operation as a unit of one or more pools or parts thereof in a field.

The commission shall make an order providing for the unit operation of a pool or part thereof if it finds that:

Such operation is reasonably necessary to increase the ultimate recovery of oil or gas; and

The value of the estimated additional recovery of oil or gas exceeds the estimated additional cost incident to conducting such operations.

The order shall be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable and shall prescribe a plan for unit operations that shall include:

A description of the pool, or parts thereof, to be so operated, termed the unit area, but only so much of a pool as has reasonably been defined and determined by drilling operations to be productive of oil or gas may be included within the unit area;

A statement of the nature of the operations contemplated;

An allocation to the separately owned tracts in the unit area of all the oil and gas that is produced from the unit area and is saved, being the production that is not used in the conduct of operations on the unit area or not unavoidably lost. The allocation shall be in accord with the agreement, if any, of the interested parties. If there is no such agreement, the commission shall determine the relative value, from evidence introduced at the hearing, of the separately owned tracts in the unit area, exclusive of physical equipment, for development of oil and gas by unit operations. The commission shall require the production of or may itself produce such geological, engineering, or other evidence, at the hearing or at any continuance thereof, as may be required to protect the interests of all interested persons. The production allocated to each tract shall be the proportion that the relative value of each tract so determined bears to the relative value of all tracts in the unit area.

A provision for the credits and charges to be made in the adjustment among the owners in the unit area for their respective investments in wells, tanks, pumps, machinery, materials, and equipment contributed to the unit operations;

A provision providing how the costs of unit operations, including capital investments, shall be determined and charged to the separately owned tracts and how said costs shall be paid, including a provision providing when, how, and by whom the unit production allocated to an owner who does not pay the share of the cost of unit operations charged to such owner, or the interest of such owner, may be sold and the proceeds applied to the payment of such costs;

A provision, if necessary, for carrying or otherwise financing any person who elects to be carried or otherwise financed, allowing a reasonable interest charge for such service payable out of such person's share of the production;

A provision for the supervision and conduct of the unit operations, in respect to which each person shall have a vote with a value corresponding to the percentage of the costs of unit operations chargeable against the interest of such person;

The time when the unit operations shall commence, and the manner in which, and the circumstances under which, the unit operations shall terminate; and

Such additional provisions that are found to be appropriate for carrying on the unit operations, and for the protection of correlative rights.

No order of the commission providing for unit operations shall become effective unless the plan for unit operations prescribed by the commission has been approved in writing by those persons who, under the commission's order, will be required to pay at least eighty percent of the costs of the unit operation, and also by the owners of at least eighty percent of the production or proceeds thereof that will be credited to interests which are free of cost, such as royalties, overriding royalties, and production payments, and the commission has made a finding, either in the order providing for unit operations or in a supplemental order, that the plan for unit operations has been so approved. If the plan for unit operations has not been so approved at the time the order providing for unit operations is made, the commission shall upon application and notice hold such supplemental hearings as may be required to determine if and when the plan for unit operations has been so approved. If the persons owning the required percentage of interest in the unit area do not approve the plan for unit operations within a period of six months from the date on which the order providing for unit operations is made, such order shall be ineffective and shall be revoked by the commission unless for good cause shown the commission extends said time.

An order providing for unit operations may be amended by an order made by the commission in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an original order providing for unit operations; but if such an amendment affects only the rights and interests of the owners, the approval of the amendment by the owners of royalty, overriding royalty, production payment, and other such interests which are free of costs shall not be required. No such order of amendment shall change the percentage for the allocation of oil and gas as established for any separately owned tract by the original order, except with the consent of all persons owning oil and gas rights in such tract, or change the percentage for the allocation of cost as established for any separately owned tract by the original order, except with the consent of all owners in such tract.

The commission, by an order, may provide for the unit operation of a pool, or parts thereof, that embraces a unit area established by a previous order of the commission. Such order, in providing for the allocation of unit production, shall first treat the unit area previously established as a single tract, and the portion of the unit production so allocated thereto shall then be allocated among the separately owned tracts included in such previously established unit area in the same proportions as those specified in the previous order.

An order may provide for unit operations on less than the whole of a pool where the unit area is of such size and shape as may be reasonably required for that purpose, and the conduct thereof will have no adverse effect upon other portions of the pool.

All operations, including, but not limited to, the commencement, drilling, or operation of a well upon any portion of the unit area shall be deemed for all purposes the conduct of such operations upon each separately owned tract in the unit area by the several owners thereof. The portion of the unit production allocated to a separately owned tract in a unit area shall, when produced, be deemed, for all purposes, to have been actually produced from such tract by a well drilled thereon. Operations conducted pursuant to an order of the commission providing for unit operations shall constitute a fulfillment of all the express or implied obligations of each lease or contract covering lands in the unit area to the extent that compliance with such obligations cannot be had because of the order of the commission.

The portion of the unit production allocated to any tract, and the proceeds from the sale thereof, shall be the property and income of the several persons to whom, or to whose credit, the same are allocated or payable under the order providing for unit operations.

No division order or other contract relating to the sale or purchase of production from a separately owned tract shall be terminated by the order providing for unit operations, but shall remain in force and apply to oil and gas allocated to such tract until terminated in accordance with the provisions thereof.

Except to the extent that the parties affected so agree, no order providing for unit operations shall be construed to result in a transfer of all or any part of the title of any person to the oil and gas rights in any tract in the unit area. All property, whether real or personal, that may be acquired in the conduct of unit operations under this article, shall be acquired for the account of the owners within the unit area, and shall be the property of such owners in the proportion that the expenses of unit operations are charged.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 660, § 12.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(12).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-16.

L. 65:

p. 894, § 1.

34-60-118.5. Payment of proceeds - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Payee" means any person or persons legally entitled to payment from proceeds derived from the sale of oil, gas, or associated products from a well in Colorado, but shall not include those interests owned by the state of Colorado.

"Payer" means the first purchaser of oil, gas, or associated products from a well in Colorado unless the first purchaser has entered into an agreement under which the operator of a well has accepted responsibility for making payments to payees, in which case such operator shall be the payer.

Unless otherwise agreed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), payments of proceeds derived from the sale of oil, gas, or associated products shall be paid by a payer to a payee commencing not later than six months after the end of the month in which production is first sold. Thereafter, such payments shall be made on a monthly basis not later than sixty days for oil and ninety days for gas and associated products following the end of the calendar month in which subsequent production is sold. Payments may be made annually if the aggregate sum due a payee for twelve consecutive months is one hundred dollars or less.

The payer and payee may provide, in a valid lease or other agreement, for terms or arrangements for payment that differ from those set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

(2.3) Notwithstanding any other applicable terms or arrangements, every payment of proceeds derived from the sale of oil, gas, or associated products shall be accompanied by information that includes, at a minimum:

A name, number, or combination of name and number that identifies the lease, property, unit, or well or wells for which payment is being made;

The month and year during which the sale occurred for which payment is being made;

The total quantity of product sold attributable to such payment, including the units of measurement for the sale of such product;

The price received per unit of measurement, which shall be the price per barrel in the case of oil and the price per thousand cubic feet ("MCF") or per million British thermal units ("MMBTU") in the case of gas;

The total amount of severance taxes and any other production taxes or levies applied to the sale;

The payee's interest in the sale, expressed as a decimal and calculated to at least the sixth decimal place;

The payee's share of the sale before any deductions or adjustments made by the payer or identified with the payment;

The payee's share of the sale after any deductions or adjustments made by the payer or identified with the payment;

An address and telephone number from which additional information may be obtained and questions answered.

(2.5) Upon written request by the payee, submitted to the payer by certified mail, the payer shall provide to the payee within sixty days a written explanation of those deductions or adjustments over which the payer has control and for which the payer has information, whether or not identified with the payment, and, if requested by the payee, such meter calibration testing and production reporting records that are required to be maintained by the payer in accordance with section 34-60-106 (1)(e). The requirement to provide a written explanation of deductions or adjustments shall not preclude the payer from answering the inquiry by referring the payee to the royalty clause or payment provision in a lease or other agreement.

(2.7) A payer who fails to provide information required or requested in accordance with subsection (2.3) or (2.5) of this section shall be subject to penalties as provided in section 34-60-121.

Compliance with the payment deadlines set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall be suspended when payments are withheld for a period of time due to any of the following reasons:

A failure or delay by the payee to confirm in writing the payee's fractional interest in the proceeds after a reasonable request in writing by the payer for such confirmation;

A reasonable doubt by the payer as to the payee's identity, whereabouts, or clear title to an interest in proceeds; or

Litigation that would affect the distribution of payments to a payee.

Any delay in determining whether or not a payee is entitled to an interest in proceeds shall not affect payments to all other payees so entitled.

If a payer does not make payment within the time frames specified in subsection (2) of this section and such delay in payment was not caused by any of the reasons specified in subsection (3) of this section, the payer shall pay such payee simple interest on the amount of the proceeds withheld, which interest shall be calculated from the date of each sale at a rate equal to two times the discount rate at the federal reserve bank of Kansas City as such rate existed on the first day of the calendar year or years in which proceeds were withheld.

Absent a bona fide dispute over the interpretation of a contract for payment, the oil and gas conservation commission shall have jurisdiction to determine the following:

The date on which payment of proceeds is due a payee under subsection (2) of this section;

The existence or nonexistence of an occurrence pursuant to subsection (3) of this section which would justifiably cause a delay in payment; and

The amount of the proceeds plus interest, if any, due a payee by a payer.

(5.5) Before hearing the merits of any proceeding regarding payment of proceeds pursuant to this section, the oil and gas conservation commission shall determine whether a bona fide dispute exists regarding the interpretation of a contract defining the rights and obligations of the payer and payee. If the commission finds that such a dispute exists, the commission shall decline jurisdiction over the dispute and the parties may seek resolution of the matter in district court.

The commission may assign to the parties the costs of any administrative proceeding pursuant to this section in such proportions as it deems appropriate and may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party. The moneys received by the commission to cover the costs of such administrative proceedings shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such moneys to the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122.

As a prerequisite to seeking relief under this section for the failure of a payer to make timely payment, a payee shall give the payer written notice by certified mail of such failure and the payer shall have twenty days after receipt of the required notice in which to pay the proceeds, plus any interest due thereon, in accordance with the provisions of this section or to respond in writing explaining the reason for nonpayment.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter existing substantive rights or obligations nor to impose upon the oil and gas conservation commission any duty to interpret a contract from which the obligation to pay proceeds arises.

Subsections (2.3), (2.5), and (2.7) of this section shall apply to payments of proceeds derived from sales occurring on or after July 1, 1998.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1374, § 1, effective July 1, 1990.

L. 98:

(2) and IP(5) amended and (2.3), (2.5), (2.7), (5.5), and (8) added, p. 636, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(6) amended, p. 733, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2.5) amended, p. 1344, § 2, effective May 29.

34-60-119. Production - limitation.

This article shall never be construed to require, permit, or authorize the commission or any court to make, enter, or enforce any order, rule, or judgment that prorates production by requiring restriction of production of any pool or of any well, except a well or wells drilled in violation of section 34-60-116, to an amount less than the well or pool can produce without waste.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 661, § 14.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(14).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-18.

L. 55:

p. 658, 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-18.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1360, § 7, effective May 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 320, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

34-60-120. Application of article.

This article shall apply to all lands within the state of Colorado, except as follows:

As to lands of the United States or lands which are subject to its supervision, this article shall apply only to the extent necessary to permit the commission to protect the correlative rights of each owner and producer within a pool and to carry out the provisions of sections 34-60-106, 34-60-117 (4), 34-60-118, and 34-60-122; but the other provisions of this article shall also apply to such lands only if the officer of the United States having jurisdiction approves the order of the commission which purports to affect such lands.

This article shall not in any case apply to any lands committed to any unit or cooperative agreement approved by the department of interior, except as provided in sections 34-60-106, 34-60-117 (4), and 34-60-118, and except as to privately owned or state lands; except that section 34-60-122 shall apply to all lands and to all production from all lands within the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 661, § 13.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(13).

L. 52:

p. 132, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-17.

L. 55:

p. 656, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-17.

L. 71:

p. 1050, § 1.